District of Columbia statutes.
7-1206.01

Security requirement.

Mental health professionals, mental health facilities and data collectors shall maintain records of mental health information in a secure manner as to effectuate the purposes of this chapter. Any entity that receives mental health information shall have appropriate administrative, technical, and physical safeguards in place to protect the confidentiality of mental health information and shall promptly notify the Department of Mental Health in writing of any unauthorized disclosure or use of mental health information.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 601, 25 DCR 5055
Dec. 4, 2010, D.C. Law 18-273, § 204(d), 57 DCR 7171
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 53(b)(2), 59 DCR 6190
1981 Ed., § 6-2051.
1973 Ed., § 6-1638.
D.C. Law 18-273 added the second sentence.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 validated a previously made technical correction.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 204(d) of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-530, August 6, 2010, 57 DCR 8099).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 204(d) of Data-Sharing and Information Coordination Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-582, October 20, 2010, 57 DCR 10118).